Hawaii statutes.
§386-87 Appeals to appellate board.
(a) A decision of the director shall be final and conclusive between the
parties, except as provided in section 386-89, unless within twenty days after
a copy has been sent to each party, either party appeals therefrom to the
appellate board by filing a written notice of appeal with the appellate board
or the department. In all cases of appeal filed with the department the
appellate board shall be notified of the pendency thereof by the director. No
compromise shall be effected in the appeal except in compliance with section
386-78.

(b) The appellate board shall hold a full
hearing de novo on the appeal.

(c) The appellate board shall have power to
review the findings of fact, conclusions of law and exercise of discretion by
the director in hearing, determining or otherwise handling of any compensation
case and may affirm, reverse or modify any compensation case upon review, or
remand the case to the director for further proceedings and action.

(d) In the absence of an appeal and within
thirty days after mailing of a certified copy of the appellate board's decision
or order, the appellate board may, upon the application of the director or any
other party, or upon its own motion, reopen the matter and thereupon may take
further evidence or may modify its findings, conclusions or decisions. The
time to initiate judicial review shall run from the date of mailing of the
further decision if the matter has been reopened. If the application for
reopening is denied, the time to initiate judicial review shall run from the
date of mailing of the denial decision. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-96;
HRS §386-87; am L 1969, c 244, §2d; am L 1974, c 8, §1]

Cross References

Hearings, see chapter 91.

Case Notes

Constitutional. 24 H. 97 (1917).

If board's questions to court are ambiguous or uncertain, the
reserved question cannot be answered or determined. 31 H. 554 (1930).

Reservations to supreme court confined to questions of law.
37 H. 517 (1947). See 33 H. 412 (1935); 34 H. 65 (1937).

Appeal lies from circuit court to supreme court. 38 H. 384
(1949).

Contested case heard by appellate board is bound by
requirements of §91-10. 54 H. 479, 510 P.2d 89 (1973).

Issue of credibility is responsibility of appeals board as
fact finder. 56 H. 552, 545 P.2d 692 (1976).

Time for filing a written notice of appeal is mandatory. 57
H. 37, 549 P.2d 470 (1976).

Denial of application for reconsideration under subsection
(d) is not subject to requirements of §91-11. 57 H. 535, 560 P.2d 1292 (1977).

A motion to reopen a case for newly discovered evidence
pursuant to §386-89(a) tolls the twenty-day period within which a claimant must
appeal the department's decision under this section. 85 H. 275, 942 P.2d 539
(1997).

Collateral estoppel did not preclude determination that
employee was permanently and totally disabled, despite employee's failure to
appeal department's finding of no permanent disability, since finding was
superfluous to department's decision. 8 H. App. 543, 812 P.2d 1199 (1991).

Where there was no rational basis for board's refusing to
consider additional evidence submitted by claimant, and no cogent explanation
for board's failure to consider evidence in light of its direct effect on
board's finding and conclusion, board abused its discretion in denying
claimant's motion to reopen case. 93 H. 116 (App.), 997 P.2d 42 (2000).

Claimant's appeal of director's decision was untimely where
appeal was not filed for that decision within twenty-day deadline as required
under subsection (a), notwithstanding that other issues were yet to be
decided. 98 H. 508 (App.), 51 P.3d 375 (2002).

At the time plaintiff's appeals matured, where plaintiff
was precluded by Hawaii administrative rule §12-15-94(d) from appealing the
director's decisions to the labor and industrial relations appeals board,
plaintiff could not be faulted for failing to file notices of appeal with the
board within the twenty-day time limit as required by this section; thus,
plaintiff was given twenty days from the effective date of this judgment to
file appeals of the director's decisions with the board. 120 H. 101 (App.),
201 P.3d 614 (2009).

Section 386-73 and this section set forth the right to appeal
from the decisions of the director in workers' compensation cases and it gives
a party the right to appeal the decision of the director in a medical fee
dispute to the labor and industrial relations appeals board; thus, the
no-appeal provision of Hawaii administrative rule §12-15-94(d) was invalid as
inconsistent with this chapter, and the director exceeded the director's
rulemaking authority in making the director's decisions in medical fee disputes
final and non-appealable. 120 H. 101 (App.), 201 P.3d 614 (2009).

Petitioner's September 7, 2010 appeal was timely, where
petitioner's June 14, 2010 letter to the disability compensation division (DCD)
objecting to the director's approval of petitioner's attorney's fees and
requesting a hearing, followed by petitioner's subsequent letters, was an
application to reopen the case pursuant to §386-89(a) to permit the
introduction of newly discovered evidence and the DCD's August 30, 2010 letter
was the director's final decision denying the application to reopen the case.
132 H. 320, 321 P.3d 671 (2014).

Cited: 27 H. 431, 433 (1923); 31 H. 672, 676 (1930); 31 H.
814, 815 (1931); 32 H. 699, 700 (1933); 32 H. 928 (1933); 37 H. 556 (1947); 37 H.
583 (1947); 39 H. 258 (1952).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next